District of Columbia statutes.
7-1208.07

Effective date.

The provisions of this chapter shall take effect pursuant to § 1-206.02(c)(1) and shall govern all mental health information regardless of when such information came into existence. However, the provisions of this chapter which create liabilities shall only apply to acts or failures to act which occur on or after the effective date.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-136, § 807(a), 25 DCR 5055
1973 Ed., § 6-1648.
1981 Ed., § 6-2076.